Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.010

General corporate powers—Towns, restrictions as to area.

(1) Municipal corporations now or hereafter organized are bodies politic and corporate under the name of the city of . . . . . ., or the town of . . . . . ., as the case may be, and as such may sue and be sued, contract or be contracted with, acquire, hold, possess and dispose of property, subject to the restrictions contained in other chapters of this title, having a common seal, and change or alter the same at pleasure, and exercise such other powers, and have such other privileges as are conferred by this title. However, not more than two square miles in area shall be included within the corporate limits of a town having a population of fifteen hundred or less, or located in a county with a population of one million or more, and not more than three square miles in area shall be included within the corporate limits of a town having a population of more than fifteen hundred in a county with a population of less than one million, nor shall more than twenty acres of unplatted land belonging to any one person be taken within the corporate limits of a town without the consent of the owner of such unplatted land.

(2) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a town located in three or more counties is excluded from a limitation in square mileage.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the original incorporation of a town shall be limited to an area of not more than one square mile and a population as prescribed in RCW 35.01.040.

[ 1995 c 196 s 5; 1991 c 363 s 37; 1965 c 138 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.010. Prior: 1963 c 119 s 1; 1890 p 141 s 15, part; RRS s 8935.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Validation of certain incorporations and annexations—Municipal corporations of the fourth class—1961 ex.s. c 16: "Any incorporation of a municipal corporation of the fourth class and any annexation of territory to a municipal corporation of the fourth class prior to March 31, 1961, which is otherwise valid except for compliance with the limitation to the area of one square mile as prescribed by section 15, page 141, Laws of 1889-90, is hereby validated and declared to be a valid incorporation or annexation in all respects." [ 1961 ex.s. c 16 s 1.]